District of Columbia statutes.
32-1331.14

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 30-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 30-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

History

Aug. 3, 1956, 70 Stat. 976, ch. 924, § 214
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-300, § 2(b), 60 DCR 2679

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-300 added this section.